examples/apertium-hin.hin.dix.xml
	 <pardef n="द/े__vblex_tv">
      <e>       <p><l>ूँगा</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगे</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
       <e>       <p><l>ूँगी</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>ेंगी</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगा</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगा</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगी</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगी</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगा</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगे</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगी</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगी</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेनेवाला</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेनेवाले</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेनेवाली</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेनेवाली</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेना</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेनी</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेने</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ूँ</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ें</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ो</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ो</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>े</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ें</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>े</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ो</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ो</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेता</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेते</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेती</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेती</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेकर</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>ेके</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>िया</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>िये</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>िए</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>िये</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ी</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ी</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="आ__vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>यी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<e lm="आयी"><i>आ</i><par n="आ__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="खे"><i>ख</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="सहयोग दे"><i>सहयोग<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="निकाल दे"><i>निकाल<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="सहायता दे"><i>सहायता<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="सहमति दे"><i>सहमति<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="अनुमति दे"><i>अनुमति<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पूर्वाभास दे"><i>पूर्वाभास<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="भड़का दे"><i>भड़का<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="आने दे"><i>आने<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="सहारा दे"><i>सहारा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="जवाब दे"><i>जवाब<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="स्वीकृति दे"><i>स्वीकृति<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="गवाही दे"><i>गवाही<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="प्रतिशोध ले"><i>प्रतिशोध<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="फीछे ले"><i>फीछे<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पटक दे"><i>पटक<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="जन्म दे"><i>जन्म<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="जगह दे"><i>जगह<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="आदेश दे"><i>आदेश<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="काट दे"><i>काट<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="लूट ले"><i>लूट<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="स्राप दे"><i>स्राप<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ऋण ले"><i>ऋण<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="भेद दे"><i>भेद<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="घूस दे"><i>घूस<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ला दे"><i>ला<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="डकार ले"><i>डकार<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="छिपा ले"><i>छिपा<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="खरीद ले"><i>खरीद<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="दिलासा दे"><i>दिलासा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="उलट दे"><i>उलट<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="साथ ले"><i>साथ<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="रोक ले"><i>रोक<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पकड़ ले"><i>पकड़<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="भर दे"><i>भर<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="शह दे"><i>शह<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="प्रोत्साहन दे"><i>प्रोत्साहन<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="मान्यता दे"><i>मान्यता<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="छीन ले"><i>छीन<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="जोड़ दे"><i>जोड़<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="कमीशन दे"><i>कमीशन<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="दिलचस्पी ले"><i>दिलचस्पी<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="दबा दे"><i>दबा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="चन्दा दे"><i>चन्दा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="खरिद ले"><i>खरिद<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ढक ले"><i>ढक<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="इशारा दे"><i>इशारा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="आकार दे"><i>आकार<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="बर्गला दे"><i>बर्गला<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="त्याग दे"><i>त्याग<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="तफ़सील दे"><i>तफ़सील<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="टाल दे"><i>टाल<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="तलाक दे"><i>तलाक<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="हरा दे"><i>हरा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="वापस ले"><i>वापस<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="दवा दे"><i>दवा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ज्ञन दे"><i>ज्ञन<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="महत्त्व दे"><i>महत्त्व<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="आन्ंअद ले"><i>आन्ंअद<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="दाखिला दे"><i>दाखिला<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="छुटकारा दे"><i>छुटकारा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="रख ले"><i>रख<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="उद्धरण दे"><i>उद्धरण<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पक्ष ले"><i>पक्ष<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="मोह ले"><i>मोह<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="अत्यधिक दे"><i>अत्यधिक<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="तोड़ ले"><i>तोड़<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="खा ले"><i>खा<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="चंदा दे"><i>चंदा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="क्षेणी दे"><i>क्षेणी<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="दुःख दे"><i>दुःख<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="गारन्टी दे"><i>गारन्टी<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="दे दे"><i>दे<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="झाँसा दे"><i>झाँसा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="सटा ले"><i>सटा<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="गिन ले"><i>गिन<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="दखल दे"><i>दखल<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="मौल ले"><i>मौल<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="शाथ दे"><i>शाथ<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="थका दे"><i>थका<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="लिटा दे"><i>लिटा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="उधार दे"><i>उधार<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पछाड़ दे"><i>पछाड़<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="तेल दे"><i>तेल<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="लिपटा ले"><i>लिपटा<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="बलि दे"><i>बलि<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="क्षमा दे"><i>क्षमा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="तनख़वाह दे"><i>तनख़वाह<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="मंजूरी दे"><i>मंजूरी<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="फ़ोटो ले"><i>फ़ोटो<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="प्रकाश दे"><i>प्रकाश<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="तरक्की दे"><i>तरक्की<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="बढा दे"><i>बढा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="महत्व दे"><i>महत्व<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ओहदा दे"><i>ओहदा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="हर्जाना दे"><i>हर्जाना<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="लगाम दे"><i>लगाम<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पारिश्रमिक दे"><i>पारिश्रमिक<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="हाजिरी दे"><i>हाजिरी<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="रहने दे"><i>रहने<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="बसेरा ले"><i>बसेरा<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="भाँप ले"><i>भाँप<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="सलाह ले"><i>सलाह<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="बांट दे"><i>बांट<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="शक दे"><i>शक<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="कट दे"><i>कट<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="फोटो ले"><i>फोटो<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ढूॅंढ ले"><i>ढूॅंढ<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="उप-ठेका ले"><i>उप-ठेका<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="सह ले"><i>सह<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="टिप दे"><i>टिप<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ठोकर दे"><i>ठोकर<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="काम ले"><i>काम<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="तोड़-मरोड़ दे"><i>तोड़-मरोड़<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="गारंटी दे"><i>गारंटी<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="संताप दे"><i>संताप<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="धँसा दे"><i>धँसा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="जम्हाई ले"><i>जम्हाई<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
